Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201850-1506
Election contest; qualifications challenge; when considered; provisions applicable.

(1) The contest of an election or challenge of the qualifications of a person elected as a member of the Legislature by an unsuccessful candidate shall be considered at the next regular session of the Legislature following the general election.

(2) The election contest or qualifications challenge shall be heard and determined in accordance with the Legislative Qualifications and Election Contests Act and the Rules of the Nebraska Unicameral Legislature.

Laws 2018, LB744, § 13.